Utah statutes.
26-15-3.   Department to advise regarding the plumbing code.

(1)  The department shall advise the Division of Occupational and Professional Licensing and the Uniform Building Code Commission with respect to the adoption of a state construction code under Section 15A-1-204, including providing recommendations as to:

(a)  a specific edition of a plumbing code issued by a nationally recognized code authority; and

(b)  any amendments to a nationally recognized code.

(2)  The department may enforce the plumbing code adopted under Section 15A-1-204.

(3)  Section 58-56-9 does not apply to health inspectors acting under this section.

